California, session 20252026, AB2355.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14000.02 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14000.02. In developing a comprehensive hospital value strategy pursuant to Item 4260-001-0001, Item 4260-001-0143, and Item 4260-001-0890 of the Budget Act of 2025, the department shall engage with relevant stakeholders with firsthand experience, including, but not limited to, hospitals, cities, counties, cities and counties, organizations representing these groups, and other affected stakeholders as the department deems necessary. The department shall ensure that the comprehensive hospital value strategy includes a focus on rural hospitals, critical access hospitals, and public hospitals.